California statutes. Education Code
(e) “User fees” means any rents, deposits, or fees paid to the local administration of any campus for the use of any project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1125, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

90087.

(a) There is in the State Treasury the Affordable Student Housing Revolving Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the fund is hereby continuously appropriated for the purposes of this article. 

(b) Moneys in the fund shall be available for use by the trustees, as they deem necessary, in combination with the proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to the State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947 (Article 2 (commencing with Section 90010)) to ensure that the housing projects constructed will be affordable to students. Moneys in the fund shall be used in connection with newly constructed student housing projects in accordance with the priorities adopted by the trustees pursuant to Section 90089.

(c) Any funds received from the Affordable Student Housing Revolving Fund for use as authorized in this article shall be repaid from user fees over a 40-year period, with interest at a rate not to exceed two-thirds of the most current investment rate of the Pooled Money Investment Account as of the date of disbursement of funds from the Affordable Student Housing Revolving Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

90088.

(a) The chancellor and each local administration of a campus shall administer the provisions of this article in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the trustees pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) The trustees shall adopt rules and regulations to establish general guidelines for the administration of this article.

(c) The trustees shall adopt regulations defining the term “affordable student housing” as used in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1125, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

90089.

The trustees shall develop a five-year priority list of the housing needs at each of the campuses, taking into account the impact of the students attending that campus on the local pool of affordable housing available for senior citizens and other limited-income people with critical housing needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1125, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. California Maritime Academy [90100. - 90191.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [90100. - 90100.]

90100.

The California Maritime Academy, a specialized institution, is part of the California State University. The primary mission of the academy is to provide instruction in the maritime sciences, engineering, and related fields, including all those necessary to provide the highest quality licensed officers for the United States Merchant Marine and California maritime industries. The trustees may require students to qualify for United States Merchant Marine licenses as a condition of earning a degree.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1298, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 1.5 of Ch. 1298.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [90120. - 90123.]

90120.

The trustees shall administer and govern the academy. The trustees shall establish a Board of Visitors to the California Maritime Academy whose members shall be reimbursed for their reasonable expenses incurred in connection with their official duties concerning the academy. The board of visitors shall consist of no less than five representatives from maritime or maritime-related industries who shall advise the president on matters related to the mission of the academy. The trustees shall invite a representative of the Federal Maritime Administration to serve as a nonvoting participant at the meetings of the board of visitors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1298, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 1.5 of Ch. 1298.)
-------------------------------------------

90121.

The president of the academy is also the commander of the academy and has, subject to the regulations of the trustees, the direct control, supervision, and management of the academy, and any other powers and duties as provided by regulations of the trustees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1298, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 1.5 of Ch. 1298.)
-------------------------------------------

90122.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the trustees shall administer the academy to comply with any federal statute and regulations governing maritime operations and maritime academies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1298, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 1.5 of Ch. 1298.)
-------------------------------------------

90123.

The trustees shall determine what provisions of law are contrary to the mission and operation of the academy and shall propose any legislation considered necessary and desirable for the mission and operation of the academy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1298, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 1.5 of Ch. 1298.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Admission [90130. - 90130.]

90130.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the trustees shall determine eligibility for admission and continued enrollment at the academy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1298, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 1.5 of Ch. 1298.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Tuition, Fees, and Financial Aid [90140. - 90142.]

90140.

The trustees shall establish appropriate miscellaneous fees for the academy. These fees shall be for purposes unique to the academy, such as the annual training cruise and uniforms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1298, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 1.5 of Ch. 1298.)
-------------------------------------------

90141.

The Legislature hereby finds that the academy provides full-time programs that limit opportunity for student employment. For that reason, it is difficult for students attending the academy to contribute to the cost of their education through employment while attending. This limits the opportunity for students who have little or no financial ability to contribute to the payment of their cost of education.

For these reasons, the trustees shall develop and adopt a policy that provides opportunities for financial assistance for students to attend the academy and that provides for the active recruitment of students from economically disadvantaged backgrounds and underrepresented groups. In order to implement this policy, the trustees may make full use of any and all state and federal funds available and may receive private contributions, including those from the maritime industry, for this purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1298, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 1.5 of Ch. 1298.)
-------------------------------------------

90142.

The trustees may provide for the payment of tuition and fees charged students by installments payable at intervals determined by the trustees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1298, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 1.5 of Ch. 1298.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Facilities [90150. - 90150.]

90150.

The Legislature recognizes that the academy has unique facilities, such as a large ship docking facility, training ship, several smaller vessels, and equipment, which provide potential resources to the California State University.

The trustees are encouraged to develop programs designed to increase the sharing and lending of facilities among the academy and the other campuses of the California State University and to allow the exchange of students and instructors when that action is not inconsistent with the mission of the academy and the other campuses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1298, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 1.5 of Ch. 1298.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Trust Account Deposits [90160. - 90160.]

90160.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the chief fiscal officer of the academy shall deposit into and maintain in local trust accounts, or in other California State University trust accounts or in the California Maritime Academy Trust Fund, which is hereby continued in existence in the State Treasury, funds received in connection with the following sources or purposes:

(1) Advance payment for anticipated expenditures or encumbrances in connection with federal grants or contracts.

(2) Miscellaneous receipts in the nature of deposits and subject to return upon approval of a proper application.

(3) Fees and charges for services, materials, and facilities required of persons who, at their option, use the services or facilities, or who are provided the materials, for which the fees or charges are made. Fees and charges so received and deposited shall be used to meet the costs of providing those services, facilities, and materials.

(4) Fees for student activities, as defined by the trustees, and revenues derived from the conduct of student activities. The trustees may administer and use the fees and revenues to support the student activities.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, funds deposited and maintained under this section are continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the trustees for the support of the academy as may be determined by the trustees consistent with the terms and conditions of any agreement under which the funds were received. The funds so deposited and maintained may be invested by the chief fiscal officer of the academy, or by the State Treasurer, as appropriate, upon approval of the trustees, consistent with this section and the terms and conditions of any agreement under which the funds were received.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1298, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 1.5 of Ch. 1298.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Training Cruise Expenses [90170. - 90170.]

90170.

The trustees may, out of any appropriation made for the support of the California State University, without at the time furnishing vouchers and itemized statements, withdraw a sum or sums necessary to be used by the academy to provide for the payment of expenses of any training cruise, which shall be paid to the master of the training vessel. The sum or sums so drawn for any training cruise shall, not later than 30 days following the termination of the training cruise be accounted for and substantiated by vouchers and itemized statements. Any unexpended balance of the sum or sums so withdrawn shall be returned to the appropriation from which originally withdrawn.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1298, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 1.5 of Ch. 1298.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Federal Funds and Resources [90180. - 90182.]

90180.

The trustees shall take all necessary steps to acquire the maximum amount of federal funds from all available sources for the academy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1298, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 1.5 of Ch. 1298.)
-------------------------------------------

90181.

The Governor may apply in writing to the federal government to furnish a suitable vessel with all apparel, charts, books, and instruments of navigation and land with all buildings and equipment thereon to be used for the benefit of the academy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1298, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 1.5 of Ch. 1298.)
-------------------------------------------

90182.

The trustees may receive from the federal government or from other sources, and use for the purposes of the academy, a vessel or vessels detailed or furnished by the federal government or from other sources with all apparel, charts, books, and instruments of navigation, and land with all buildings and equipment thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1298, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 1.5 of Ch. 1298.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Employees [90190. - 90190.]

90190.

Employees of the academy shall retain and carry over to their status as employees of the trustees any seniority credit, permanent status, and accumulated leave as earned and available immediately prior to the employee’s transfer to employment with the trustees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1298, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 1.5 of Ch. 1298.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Operative Date [90191. - 90191.]

90191.

This chapter shall become operative on July 1, 1995.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1298, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 1.5 of Ch. 1298.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Specific Provisions Relating to Particular Campuses [90400. - 90407.]



  ARTICLE 1. California State Polytechnic University and California Polytechnic State University [90400. - 90407.]

90400.

(a) The California Polytechnic State University included within the California State University is comprised of a campus or complex of buildings, facilities, and land situated within the County of San Luis Obispo.

(b) The California State Polytechnic University included within the California State University is comprised of a campus or complex of buildings, facilities, and land situated within the County of Los Angeles and within or near the City of Pomona and the City of San Dimas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 168.)
-------------------------------------------

90401.

The trustees may provide for the establishment of a separate California State Polytechnic University at the campus or complex situated in the County of Los Angeles, more particularly described in subdivision (b) of Section 90400, and may execute any necessary agreements and receive, on behalf of the state, any property or interest in property which may be conveyed to the state in connection therewith or for any purposes of this section.

From and after the date upon which final action for the establishment of such separate university has been taken by the trustees, there shall be, within the California State University, two separate California state polytechnic universities, comprised of the respective campuses or complexes described in Section 90400. The provisions of Section 89067, the provisions of Sections 90404 to 90406, inclusive, and any provisions of law limited in applicability specifically to the California State Polytechnic University, unless otherwise therein specified, shall be deemed applicable to either or both of such California state polytechnic universities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

90402.

It is the intent and purpose of the Legislature, in authorizing the establishment of the separate California State Polytechnic University in the County of Los Angeles at the campus or complex described in subdivision (b) of Section 90400, that the educational program there provided continue to be conducted in accordance with the essential aims and policies expressed in Section 90404, and in that certain grant deed dated November 22, 1949, as amended or modified by subsequent agreements and conveyances, whereby the W. K. Kellogg Foundation, a Michigan corporation, has granted to the State of California, for the use and benefit of the California State Polytechnic University, certain real property situated in the County of Los Angeles, which will form a part of such separate California State Polytechnic University.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90404.

In addition to the functions set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 66010.4, the California State Polytechnic University and the California Polytechnic State University shall be authorized to emphasize the applied fields of agriculture, engineering, business, home economics and other occupational and professional fields. This article shall be liberally construed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 187, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

90405.

The California State Polytechnic University and the California Polytechnic State University Agricultural Project Revolving Fund in the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) is continued in existence. The fund shall be used for loans to needy and deserving students for the purchase of livestock, poultry, seed, feed, and such other materials as are necessary for the conducting of projects by students under supervision of instructors in the school. All sums borrowed shall be returned to the revolving fund as soon as projects are completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

90406.

The trustees, with the consent of the Director of Finance, may sell or trade such of the property belonging to the state and used for the California State Polytechnic University or the California Polytechnic State University as may in the judgment of the trustees be disposed of advantageously. The proceeds of the sale shall be used for the purchase of such other land for the use of the California State Polytechnic University or the California Polytechnic State University as the trustees and the Director of Finance may deem necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

90407.

(a) Commencing July 1, 1992, the trustees shall succeed to the powers, duties, and functions of the Department of Food and Agriculture with respect to a Dairy Products Technology Center at California Polytechnic State University, San Luis Obispo, which was authorized by Section 2 of Chapter 1514 of the Statutes of 1986. 

(b) No funds appropriated by any act from the General Fund for expenditure during any fiscal year on behalf of the Dairy Products Technology Center may be encumbered unless and until the trustees determine that at least two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000), or an amount equal to the General Fund appropriation, whichever is greater, has been received from nonstate sources by California Polytechnic State University, San Luis Obispo, for the operation of the Dairy Products Technology Center for that fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 127, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Miscellaneous [90520. - 90520.]



  ARTICLE 3. State Police Services [90520. - 90520.]

90520.

The trustees shall not be charged or otherwise assessed for Department of the California Highway Patrol services to the chancellor’s office or any state facility under the control of the chancellor’s office, except for those patrol services requested by the trustees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 305, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



DIVISION 9. UNIVERSITY OF CALIFORNIA [92000. - 93000.]



  PART 57. UNIVERSITY OF CALIFORNIA [92000. - 93000.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [92000. - 92050.]



  ARTICLE 1. Name of the University [92000. - 92001.]

92000.

(a) The name “University of California” is the property of the state. No person shall, without the permission of the Regents of the University of California, use this name, or any abbreviation of it or any name of which these words are a part, in any of the following ways:

(1) To designate any business, social, political, religious, or other organization, including, but not limited to, any corporation, firm, partnership, association, group, activity, or enterprise.

(2) To imply, indicate or otherwise suggest that any such organization, or any product or service of such organization is connected or affiliated with, or is endorsed, favored, or supported by, or is opposed by the University of California.

(3) To display, advertise, or announce this name publicly at, or in connection with, any meeting, assembly, or demonstration, or any propaganda, advertising, or promotional activity of any kind which has for its purpose or any part of its purpose the support, endorsement, advancement, opposition, or defeat of any strike, lockout, or boycott or of any political, religious, sociological, or economic movement, activity, or program.

(b) Nothing in this section shall interfere with or restrict the right of any person to make a true and accurate statement of his or her present or former relationship or connection with, his or her employment by, or his or her enrollment in, the University of California in the course of stating his or her experience or qualifications for any academic, governmental, business, or professional credit or enrollment, or in connection with any academic, governmental, professional, or other employment whatsoever.

(c) Every person violating the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 847, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

92001.

Notwithstanding Section 11425.10 of the Government Code, Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to a hearing conducted by the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 938, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 98 of Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Information Requests [92005. - 92005.]

92005.

(a) In order to ensure that accurate and unfiltered information is provided to the Legislature for purposes of making informed funding decisions, whenever a request for information relating to the security of funds of the University of California is made by the California State Auditor’s Office pursuant to this section to one or more campuses of the University of California, those campuses shall not coordinate their responses with, or seek counsel, advice, or similar contact regarding their responses from, the Office of the President of the University of California before submitting the requested information to the California State Auditor’s Office.

(b) The
 California State Auditor’s Office, when requesting information under this section, shall include a statement in the request that it is requesting the information pursuant to this section and that the request for information is not to be shared with the Office of the President of the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 802, Sec. 1.   (AB 1655)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Systemwide and Presidential Initiatives [92010. - 92010.]

92010.

(a) By April 1 of each year, the University of California is requested to report to the Legislature on the systemwide programs, systemwide initiatives, and presidential initiatives of the university. The report is requested to include all of the following:

(1) A description of each program or initiative and a justification for the program or initiative that explains how it furthers the mission of the university.

(2) The total expenditures from the previous fiscal year for each program or initiative, including carryover funds.

(3) The revenue sources for each program or initiative.

(b) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 53, Sec. 26.   (SB 77)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Meetings of the Regents [92020. - 92033.]

92020.

(a) As used in this article, “Regents of the University of California” means any of the following:

 (1) The Board of Regents of the University of California.

(2) The standing and special committees or subcommittees of the Board of Regents.

(3) An advisory board, advisory commission, advisory committee, advisory subcommittee, study group, task force, or similar multimember advisory body of the Board of Regents that has continuing subject matter jurisdiction in the area of compensation, if created by formal action of the Board of Regents or of any member of the Board of Regents, and if the advisory body so created consists of one or more regents, other than ex officio members of the Board of Regents. An advisory group the purpose of which is to recruit executives for the university is excluded from this paragraph.

(b) As used in this article, “Regents of the University of California” does not include groups of three or fewer regents appointed to advise and assist the university administration in contract negotiations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 523, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

92030.

All meetings of the Regents of the University of California shall, except as otherwise provided in this article, be subject to Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1195, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

92032.

Notwithstanding Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code:

(a) The Regents of the University of California, as occasioned by necessity, may hold special meetings. The regents shall give public notice for these meetings. This notice shall be given by means of a notice hand delivered or mailed to each newspaper of general circulation and television or radio station that has requested notice in writing, so that the notice may be published or broadcast at least 72 hours before the time of the meeting. The notice shall specify the time, place, and agenda of the special meeting. The regents shall not consider any business not included in the agenda portion of the notice. Failure to comply with this subdivision shall not be excused by the fact that no action was taken at the special meeting.

(b) The Regents of the University of California may conduct closed sessions when they meet to consider or discuss any of the following matters:

(1) Matters affecting national security.

(2) The conferring of honorary degrees or other honors or commemorations.

(3) Matters involving gifts, devises, and bequests.

(4) Matters involving the purchase or sale of investments for endowment and pension funds.

(5) Matters involving litigation, when discussion in open session concerning those matters would adversely affect, or be detrimental to, the public interest.

(6) The acquisition or disposition of property, if discussion of these matters in open session could adversely affect the regents’ ability to acquire or dispose of the property on the terms and conditions they deem to be in the best public interest.

(7) (A) Matters concerning the appointment, employment, performance, compensation, or dismissal of university officers or employees, excluding individual regents other than the president of the university.

(B) (i) Action taken by a committee of the regents, and final action by the full board of regents, on a proposal for the compensation package of the following executive officers shall occur in an open session of each of those bodies, and shall include a disclosure of the compensation package and rationale for the action:

(I) The President of the University of California.

(II) The chancellor of an individual campus.

(III) A vice president.

(IV) The treasurer or the assistant treasurer.

(V) The general counsel.

(VI) The regents’ secretary.

 (ii) Members of the public shall be afforded the opportunity to address the committee and full board on the proposal during or before consideration of the action item.

(C) Discussion by a committee of the regents of, and action on, an executive compensation program or policy, and any final action by the full board of regents on that program or policy, shall occur in open session of each of those bodies.

(D) Compensation for the principal officers of the regents and the officers of the university shall include salary, benefits, perquisites, severance payments (except those made in connection with a dismissal or a litigation settlement), retirement benefits, or any other form of compensation.

(8) Matters relating to complaints or charges brought against university officers or employees, excluding individual regents other than the president of the university, unless the officer or employee requests a public hearing.

(c) While a witness is being examined during any open or closed session, any or all other witnesses in the investigation may be excluded from the proceedings by the regents.

(d) Committees of the regents may conduct closed sessions on Medi-Cal contract negotiations.

(e) The nominating committee of the regents may conduct closed sessions held for the purpose of proposing officers of the board and members of the board’s various committees.

(f) Committees of the regents may conduct closed sessions held for the purpose of proposing a student regent.

(g) The regents shall not be required to give public notice of meetings of special search or selection committees held for the purpose of conducting interviews for university officer positions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 523, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

92032.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that no proposal relating to the salary, benefits, perquisites, severance payments (except those made in connection with a dismissal or a litigation settlement), or retirement benefits, or any other form of compensation paid to an officer of the University of California shall become effective unless both of the following occur:

(1) (A) Notice of the meeting at which the proposal is to be considered has been given to each regent.

(B) Information and materials regarding the proposal, including a full disclosure of the fiscal impact, have been made available to each regent in advance of the meeting at which the proposal is to be considered.

(C) The fact that the board of regents intends to vote on a proposal concerning the compensation of an officer has been displayed in the meeting notice made available to the public in accordance with the requirements of Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Government Code or, in the case of a special meeting, in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 92032.

(D) The specific proposal has been made available, prior to the commencement of the open session of the regents at which adoption of the proposal is to be considered, to members of the public present at the open session. The proposal shall be acted upon by the regents as the final open session item for action.

(2) The proposal has been approved by the making of a motion and its adoption by a majority vote of the regents present at an open session. Nothing in this section shall preclude in open session the full discussion of the contents of the motion or the reasons why it should or should not be adopted.

(b) As used in this section, “officer” means each principal officer of the Regents of the University of California and the officers of the university, as listed in Figure 9 on page F-37 of the Analysis of the 1993–94 Budget Bill by the Legislative Analyst’s office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

92033.

The Regents of the University of California shall provide a copy of this article and Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to each regent upon his or her appointment to the board or assumption of the office of regent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1195, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.7. Indemnification of Regents, Officers, Employees, and Contractors [92037. - 92037.]

92037.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all of the following shall be indemnified from the state General Fund from all claims, demands, suits, actions, damages, judgments, costs, charges, and expenses, including court costs and attorney’s fees, and indemnified against all liability, losses, and damages of any nature whatsoever that these persons may at any time sustain by reason of any decision of the regents not to invest in any firm or firms with business operations in Sudan or with the Sudanese government:

(a) Any current or former members of the regents, jointly and individually.

(b) Any current or former officers or employees of the University of California.

(c) Any current or former investment managers under contract, or formerly under contract, with the University of California.

(d) Any current or former officers, directors, trustees, agents, or employees of any University of California foundation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 441, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Condemnation of Property by the Regents [92040. - 92040.]

92040.

The Regents of the University of California may acquire by eminent domain any property necessary to carry out any of the powers or functions of the University of California.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Construction Contracts [92050. - 92050.]

92050.

The Regents of the University of California may include or cause to be included in a contract for a construction project for the University of California a provision establishing the time within which the whole or any specified portion of the work contemplated shall be completed. The provision may provide that for each day completion is delayed beyond the specified time, the contractor shall forfeit and pay to the Regents of the University of California a specified sum of money, to be deducted from any payments due or to become due to the contractor. The sum so specified is valid as liquidated damages unless manifestly unreasonable under the circumstances existing at the time the contract was made. A contract for such a project may also provide for the payment of extra compensation to the contractor, as a bonus for completion prior to the specified time. Such provisions, if used, shall be included in the specifications and shall clearly set forth the basis for such payments. Nothing in this section restricts the authority of the Regents of the University of California to include any other provision concerning liquidated damages in any contract for a construction project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 198.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Fiscal Treasury [92100. - 92180.]



  ARTICLE 1. Withdrawal From the State Treasury [92100. - 92102.]

92100.

Any sum of money specifically appropriated to, or for the use of, or expenditure by, the Regents of the University of California, other than money appropriated by a state budget act for the general support of the University of California, may be withdrawn at any time in its entirety from the State Treasury, at the direction of the Regents of the University of California, upon a warrant payable to the treasurer of the Regents of the University of California.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92101.

The Regents of the University of California shall submit reports to the State Public Works Board of any allocations made by the Regents of the University of California pursuant to the provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92102.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the portion of each sum of money which has been or is appropriated or allocated to the Regents of the University of California for capital outlay which remains after the purpose for which each sum was appropriated or allocated has been accomplished, and which has been or is withdrawn from the State Treasury by the Regents of the University of California pursuant to the provisions of Section 92100, together with increments, by way of interest or otherwise, on the appropriation or allocation, shall be used and expended by the Regents of the University of California in executing and furthering the building and improvement program of the University of California.

These sums shall not be allocated by the Regents of the University of California to projects for the purpose of augmenting a project without prior approval of the State Public Works Board of the requested augmentation.

Each sum shall be available for expenditure in payment of any encumbrances incurred without regard to fiscal years. However, any unencumbered balances existing as of the date on which each appropriation or allocation otherwise would lapse shall then revert to the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 323, Sec. 30.   Effective July 1, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Transfer of Land Acquired by Tax Sales to the University [92110. - 92120.]

92110.

Whenever the state is the owner of any property sold for taxes and the deed to the state has been filed with the Controller, and there appears of record a mortgage upon the property to the Regents of the University of California, and the mortgage and the debt secured by the mortgage have not been both paid in full and satisfied of record, the Controller, upon receiving proof, by affidavit of the president and secretary, or acting secretary or of the treasurer of the regents, that the debt secured by the mortgage has not been fully paid, shall direct the tax collector of the county or city and county in which the lands are situated, to execute a deed of the lands in the name of the state to the Regents of the University of California.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92111.

The tax collector shall thereupon publish a notice once a week for at least three successive weeks in some newspaper published in the county or city and county in which the lands are situated, or if there is no newspaper published therein, then the tax collector shall post a notice in three conspicuous places in the county or city and county at least three weeks before the day named in the notice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92112.

The notice shall state that on or after a day mentioned, which shall be not less than four weeks, and not more than eight weeks after the first publication or posting of the notice, the tax collector will execute and deliver to the Regents of the University of California a deed to the property, and shall describe the property and shall state that the deed will be made because of a sale of the property to the state for delinquent taxes, and because the Regents of the University of California are interested in the property. No other matters need be contained in the notice. One or more pieces of land may be described in the affidavit, notice, deed, and report provided for in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

92113.
